Hawaii statutes.
§414-433 Application for certificate of
authority. (a) A foreign corporation may apply for a certificate of
authority to transact business in this State by delivering an application to
the department director for filing. The application shall set forth:

(1) The name of the foreign corporation or, if its
name is unavailable for use in this State, a corporate name that satisfies the
requirements of section 414-436;

(2) The name of the state or country under whose law
it is incorporated;

(3) Its date of incorporation;

(4) The mailing address of the corporation's
principal office and the information required by section 425R-4(a); and

(5) The names and usual business addresses of its
current directors and officers.

(b) The foreign corporation shall deliver with
the completed application a certificate of good standing or other similar
record duly authenticated by the secretary of state or other official having
custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law it is
incorporated; provided that the certificate shall be dated not earlier than
sixty days prior to the filing of the application. If the certificate is in a
foreign language, a translation attested to under oath by the translator shall
accompany the certificate. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 129, §44; am
L 2002, c 130, §30; am L 2003, c 124, §12; am L 2006, c 235, §4; am L 2008, c
54, §3; am L 2009, c 55, §12]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next